Missouri, session 2026, SB1338.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 513.605, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
513.605 and 577.690, to read as follows:
513.605. As used in sections 513.600 to 513.645,
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms mean:
(1) (a) "Beneficial interest":
a. The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any
other trust arrangement pursuant to which a trustee holds
legal or record title to real property for the benefit of
such person; or
b. The interest of a person under any other form of
express fiduciary arrangement pursuant to which any other
person holds legal or record title to real property for the
benefit of such person;
(b) "Beneficial interest" does not include the
interest of a stockholder in a corporation or the interest
of a partner in either a general partnership or limited
partnership. A beneficial interest shall be deemed to be

SB 1338 2
located where the real property owned by the trustee is
located;
(2) "Civil proceeding", any civil suit commenced by an
investigative agency under any provision of sections 513.600
to 513.645;
(3) "Criminal activity" is the commission, attempted
commission, conspiracy to commit, or the solicitation,
coercion or intimidation of another person to commit any
crime which is chargeable by indictment or information under
the following Missouri laws:
(a) Chapter 195, relating to drug regulations;
(b) Chapter 301, relating to registration and
licensing of motor vehicles;
(c) Chapter 304, but relating only to felony
violations of this chapter involving the use of a motor
vehicle;
(d) Chapter 311, but relating only to felony
violations of this chapter committed by persons not duly
licensed by the supervisor of liquor control;
(e) Chapter 409, relating to regulation of securities;
(f) Chapter 491, relating to witnesses;
(g) Chapter 565, relating to offenses against the
person;
(h) Chapter 566, relating to sexual offenses;
(i) Chapter 567, relating to prostitution;
(j) Chapter 568, relating to offenses against the
family;
(k) Chapter 569, relating to robbery, arson, burglary
and related offenses;
(l) Chapter 570, relating to stealing and related
offenses;
(m) Chapter 571, relating to weapons offenses;

SB 1338 3
(n) Chapter 572, relating to gambling;
(o) Chapter 573, relating to pornography and related
offenses;
(p) Chapter 574, relating to offenses against public
order;
(q) Chapter 575, relating to offenses against the
administration of justice;
(r) Chapter 578, but only relating to offenses by a
criminal street gang;
(s) Section 577.690, relating to the offense of
improper entry by an alien;
(4) "Criminal proceeding", any criminal prosecution
commenced by an investigative agency under any criminal law
of this state;
(5) "Investigative agency", the attorney general's
office, or the office of any prosecuting attorney or circuit
attorney;
(6) "Pecuniary value":
(a) Anything of value in the form of money, a
negotiable instrument, a commercial interest, or anything
else the primary significance of which is economic
advantage; or
(b) Any other property or service that has a value in
excess of one hundred dollars;
(7) "Real property", any estate or legal or equitable
interest in land situated in this state or any interest in
such real property, including, but not limited to, any lease
or deed of trust upon such real property;
(8) "Seizing agency", the agency which is the primary
employer of the officer or agent seizing the property,
including any agency in which one or more of the employees

SB 1338 4
acting on behalf of the seizing agency is employed by the
state of Missouri or any political subdivision of this state;
(9) "Seizure", the point at which any law enforcement
officer or agent discovers and exercises any control over
property that an officer or agent has reason to believe was
used or intended for use in the course of, derived from, or
realized through criminal activity. Seizure includes but is
not limited to preventing anyone found in possession of the
property from leaving the scene of the investigation while
in possession of the property;
(10) (a) "Trustee":
a. Any person who holds legal or record title to real
property for which any other person has a beneficial
interest; or
b. Any successor trustee or trustees to any of the
foregoing persons;
(b) "Trustee" does not include the following:
a. Any person appointed or acting as a personal
representative under chapter 475 or under chapter 473;
b. Any person appointed or acting as a trustee of any
100 testamentary trust or as trustee of any indenture of trust
101 under which any bonds are or are to be issued.
577.690. 1. A person commits the offense of improper
entry by an alien if the person enters this state at any
time when the person is in violation of 8 U.S.C. Section
1325.
2. The offense of improper entry by an alien is
punishable by a fine of one hundred thousand dollars and
shall be subject to an order of removal, as provided
pursuant to subsection 3 of this section.
3. An order of removal shall include all of the
following:

SB 1338 5
(1) The manner of transportation of the person to a
port of entry, as defined by 19 CFR Part 101; and
(2) The law enforcement officer or state agency
responsible for monitoring compliance with the order.
4. In lieu of continuing the prosecution of or
entering an adjudication regarding the offense of improper
entry, the court at any time after the person's appearance
may, upon request, dismiss the charge pending against the
person and issue an order of removal, as provided in
subsection 3 of this section.
5. The offense of improper entry by an alien shall be
subject to the provisions of sections 513.600 to 513.645.
6. Any law enforcement officer whose duty it is to
enforce criminal laws of this state may, upon probable cause
that a person has violated subsection 1 of this section,
arrest or detain such person in a manner consistent with
chapter 544.
✓